Utah statutes.
34-44-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Business relationship" means an agreement that governs the relationship
of principal and sales representative.
(2)  "Commission" means:
(a)  compensation:
(i)  that accrues to a sales representative;
(ii)  for payment by a principal; and
(iii)  at a rate expressed as a percentage of the dollar amount of sales,
orders, or profits; or
(b)  any other method of compensation agreed to between a sales representative
and a principal including:
(i)  fees for services; and
(ii)  a retainer.
(3)  "Principal" means a person who:
(a)  engages in any of the following activities with regard to a product or
service:
(i)  manufactures;
(ii)  produces;
(iii)  imports;
(iv)  sells; or
(v)  distributes;
(b)  establishes a business relationship with a sales representative to
solicit orders for a product or a service described in Subsection (3)(a); and
(c)  agrees to compensate a sales representative, in whole or in part, by
commission.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), "sales representative" means
a person who enters into a business relationship with a principal:
(i)  to solicit orders for a product or a service described in Subsection
(3)(a); and
(ii)  under which the person is compensated, in whole or in part, by
commission.
(b)  "Sales representative" does not include:
(i)  an employee of a principal;
(ii)  a person licensed under Title 31A, Insurance Code;
(iii)  a person licensed under Title 41, Chapter 3, Part 2, Licensing;
(iv)  a person licensed under Title 61, Chapter 2, Division of Real Estate;
(v)  a person who provides a product or service under a business relationship
with a principal that is incident to the purchase or sale of real property; or
(vi)  a person who places an order or purchases a product or service for that
person's own account for resale.
(5)  "Terminates" or "termination" means the end of a business relationship
between a sales representative and a principal, whether by:
(a)  agreement;
(b)  expiration of a time period; or
(c)  exercise of a right of termination by either the principal or the sales
representative.
